Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.084

Washington state quality award—Reimbursement of application fee.

Up to five associate development organizations per year contracting with the department under chapter 249, Laws of 2007 that apply for the Washington state quality award or its equivalent shall receive reimbursement for the award application fee, but may not be reimbursed more than once every three years.

[ 2007 c 249 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2007 c 249: See note following RCW 43.330.080.